Wisconsin, session 2025, AB728.
do enact as follows:AB728,11Section 1. 302.47 of the statutes is created to read:AB728,2,32302.47 Access to prisons and jails for oversight purposes. (1) In this 3section:AB728,2,44(a) “Immediate access” means access with less than 24 hours’ notice.AB728,2,55(b) “Political subdivision” means a county, city, village, or town.AB728,2,106(2) Except as provided in sub. (4), any legislator who is a member of a 7standing committee of the legislature with jurisdiction over matters related to the 8department shall be provided immediate access, upon request, to a tour of any state 9correctional institution that includes the residential areas, prison cells, meal areas, 10and discussions with prisoners.AB728,2,1711(3) Except as provided in sub. (4), any employee of a political subdivision who, 12in the course of his or her employment, is responsible for the oversight of a county 13jail shall be provided immediate access, upon request, to a tour of any county jail 14under his or her oversight or any county jail that has at least one person in custody 15who is a permanent resident of the geographic region that the employee’s position 16oversees that includes the residential areas, prison cells, meal areas, and 17discussions with prisoners.AB728,2,1918(4) A county jail or state correctional institution may deny a legislator under 19sub. (2) or an employee under sub. (3) access if any of the following applies:AB728,3,31(a) The visit is requested between the hours of 9 p.m. and 6 a.m. If immediate 2access is denied under this paragraph, access shall be provided between the hours 3of 6 a.m. and 9 p.m.AB728,3,64(b) The legislator or employee has already had 12 requests under sub. (2) or (3) 5fulfilled in that calendar year. If immediate access is denied under this paragraph, 6access shall be provided within 72 hours of when the access request was made.AB728,3,77